Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska30-401
Terms, defined.

For purposes of sections 30-401 to 30-406:

(1) Agent of the ward includes any person appointed as an agent under a power of attorney executed by or on behalf of a ward or which purports to have been executed by or on behalf of a ward;

(2) Conservator or guardian includes a special fiduciary appointed by a court to investigate the actions of an agent of the ward, the conservator, or the guardian;

(3) Personal representative includes a special administrator; and

(4) Ward means an incapacitated person or a protected person as defined in section 30-2601.

Laws 2015, LB43, § 3.